Wisconsin, session 2025, AB110.
do enact as follows:Joint Legislative Council prefatory note: This bill was prepared for the Joint Legislative Council’s Special Committee on State-Tribal Relations.Under current law, one member of the Professional Standards Council for Teachers (PSCT), which advises the Department of Public Instruction (DPI), must be a person licensed as a teacher by DPI, employed in a tribal school, and recommended by a federally recognized American Indian tribe or band in Wisconsin that has a tribal school.This bill removes the requirement that this PSCT member be licensed by DPI. Under the bill, the requirements for this PSCT member would instead be that the person is employed as a teacher in a tribal school and recommended by a federally recognized American Indian tribe or band in Wisconsin that has a tribal school.AB110,13Section 1. 15.377 (8) (c) 14. of the statutes is amended to read:AB110,2,4115.377 (8) (c) 14. One person licensed as a teacher and actively who is 2employed as a teacher in a tribal school, as defined in s. 115.001 (15m), 3recommended by a federally recognized American Indian tribe or band in this state 4that has a tribal school.AB110,25Section 2. Initial applicability.AB110,2,76(1) This act first applies to an individual appointed under s. 15.377 (8) (c) 14. 7on the effective date of this subsection.AB110,2,88